Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
Uniform Traffic Citation

431.450.
Uniform citation.

The Department of Kentucky State Police in consultation with the Transportation Cabinet shall design, print, and distribute to all law enforcement agencies in the Commonwealth a uniform citation.

The citation shall:

Be approved by the Supreme Court;

Consist of an original document and five (5) copies;

Be serially numbered in such a manner that the year of issue and the individual citation number may be readily ascertained; and

Contain such other information as may be required by the Supreme Court.

The Circuit Court clerk shall maintain a system of accountability for all citations issued in accordance with rules and regulations issued by the Supreme Court to assure that citations are not wrongfully destroyed, tampered with, or otherwise compromised in any manner.

All peace officers in the Commonwealth shall use the uniform citation for all violations of the traffic laws and for all felonies, misdemeanors, and violations.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 3; 1978, ch. 26, § 2, effective March 3, 1978; 1986, ch. 389, § 28, effective July 15, 1986; 2007, ch. 85, § 311, effective June 26, 2007.

431.4505.
Modification of uniform citation to include alcohol concentration and testing information.

The Justice and Public Safety Cabinet shall modify the uniform citation form to include spaces where the peace officer may include:

The alcohol concentration in cases of violation of KRS

189A.010

; and

Whether the defendant did take, refused to take, or was unable to take for some reason (to be specified on the citation), the alcohol concentration or drug test or tests specified by the peace officer following an arrest for violation of KRS

189A.010

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1991 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 15, § 13, effective July 1, 1991; 2007, ch. 85, § 312, effective June 26, 2007.

431.451.
Delineation of offenses for which fines may and may not be prepaid. [Repealed.]

431.452.
Prepayment of fines subject to certain conditions.

An offense which is designated as subject to prepayment by specific statutory designation may be prepaid by the violator subject to the terms and conditions of the statute involved.

When an offense that is not designated as subject to prepayment by specific statutory designation is cited on the same citation with another offense that is subject to prepayment, the officer shall cite the violator to court for all cited offenses. However, if the offense for which prepayment is not allowed is dismissed by the judge prior to the court date listed on the citation, the offense subject to prepayment by specific statutory designation may be prepaid by the violator, and the violator shall not be required to appear in court.

An offense which is designated as subject to prepayment is subject to the following conditions:

Designation as subject to prepayment does not preclude a physical arrest by a peace officer for that offense;

Designation as subject to prepayment shall preclude a requirement that the defendant make a court appearance on a uniform citation;

Except as provided for in KRS 189.990(26), for any offense designated as subject to prepayment, the defendant may elect to pay the minimum fine for the offense plus court costs to the circuit clerk before the date of his trial or be tried in the normal manner, unless the citation is marked for mandatory court appearance pursuant to KRS

431.015

or subsection (2) of this section, except that the fine for violations of KRS

189.221

,

189.222

,

189.226

,

189.270

, or

189.271

shall be in accordance with KRS 189.990(2)(a) and the defendant shall not be allowed to pay the minimum fine as otherwise allowed by this paragraph; and

Prepayment of the fine and costs shown on the citation or accompanying schedule shall be considered as a plea of guilty for all purposes.

When a peace officer issues a uniform citation and no physical arrest is made he or she shall, where the citation is designated as subject to prepayment, mark the citation as “PAYABLE”, except as provided in KRS

431.015

or subsection (2) of this section.

The Administrative Office of the Courts, after consultation with the Department of Kentucky State Police, the Transportation Cabinet, the Division of Forestry, the Department of Fish and Wildlife Resources, and a representative of law enforcement shall develop a prepayable fine and cost schedule and a uniform statewide instruction sheet for the Commonwealth.

History.

Enact. Acts 1978, ch. 26, § 5, effective March 3, 1978; 2000, ch. 512, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2006, ch. 180, § 11, effective July 12, 2006; 2007, ch. 85, § 313, effective June 26, 2007; 2008, ch. 108, § 4, effective July 15, 2008.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(7/12/2006). 2006 Ky. Acts ch. 95, relating to the creation and organization of the Commerce Cabinet, instructs the Reviser of Statutes to correct statutory references to agencies and officers whose names have been changed in that Act. Such a correction has been made in this section.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Law Journal.

Kentucky Law Survey, Fortune, Criminal Rules, 70 Ky. L.J. 395 (1981-82).

431.455.
Prohibitions — Penalty.

No peace officer or other person shall invalidate, or attempt to invalidate, destroy or attempt to destroy a record copy of a uniform citation which has been lawfully issued.

No peace officer or other person to whom uniform citations are distributed, prior to issuance to a violator, shall fail to properly account for uniform citations issued to him or to his agency as required by KRS

431.450

and the regulations issued thereunder.

No person required to file reports pursuant to KRS

431.450

and the regulations issued thereunder shall fail to file the reports within the time limits specified.

Any peace officer or other person who violates the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a Class B misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 36, § 4, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 26, § 4, effective March 3, 1978.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

An Overview of Kentucky’s New Court System, Vol. 41, No. 2, April 1977 Ky. Bench & B. 15.